Tennessee, session 114, SB0551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-102(a)(4), is amended by
deleting the language "The governor shall consult" and substituting the language "The governor
may consult".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0551
000887
- 1 -